New York, session 2025-2026, S5632.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new article 129-C 2 to read as follows: 3 ARTICLE 129-C 4 IMPLEMENTATION BY COLLEGES AND UNIVERSITIES OF A STUDENTS' BILL OF 5 RIGHTS 6 Section 6450. Students' bill of rights. 7 § 6450. Students' bill of rights. 1. As used in this section, the 8 following terms shall have the following meanings: 9 a. "Institution" shall mean any college or university in the city 10 university of New York. 11 b. "School-sponsored media" means any material that is prepared, writ- 12 ten, published, or broadcast by a student journalist at an institution, 13 distributed or generally made available to members of the student body 14 or the public. "School-sponsored media" shall not include media intended 15 for distribution or transmission solely in the classroom in which the 16 media is produced. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10141-11-5 S. 5632--D 2 1 c. "Student journalist" means a student enrolled in an institution who 2 gathers, compiles, writes, edits, photographs, records, or prepares 3 information for dissemination in school-sponsored media. 4 d. "Student media advisor" means an individual employed, appointed, or 5 designated by an institution to supervise or provide instruction relat- 6 ing to school-sponsored media. 7 2. Every institution shall adopt written rules implementing this 8 section by amending its code of conduct or other comparable policies. A 9 copy of such rules and policies shall be provided by each institution to 10 all students enrolled in said institution using a method and manner 11 appropriate to its institutional culture. Each institution shall also 12 post such rules and policies on its website in an easily accessible 13 manner to the public. 14 3. Every institution shall adopt and implement the following 15 "Students' Bill of Rights": 16 a. (i) The elected student leader shall be able to message the student 17 body through e-mail, or a substantially equivalent system utilized by 18 the institution to communicate with the student body, with prior 19 approval from the campus office of student life to ensure that the 20 communication with students complies with federal, state and local law, 21 and institution policies. Such prior approval shall be made in a timely 22 and efficient manner. Any denial of part of or an entire communication 23 shall be made in writing with a citation to the provision of law or 24 institution policy which would be violated by such communication. 25 (ii) No expression made by an elected student leader which is 26 protected by this paragraph shall be deemed to be an expression of poli- 27 cy, opinion or position of the institution, nor shall any such 28 expression be considered to be an endorsement in any way by the institu- 29 tion and no institution, employee, parent, legal guardian or administra- 30 tor of an institution shall be held liable in any civil or criminal 31 action for any expression made by an elected student leader, except in 32 cases of willful or wanton misconduct. Nothing in this paragraph shall 33 be construed to create any private action on behalf of a student other 34 than to seek injunctive relief allowing the messaging or communication 35 in question. 36 b. All student conduct cases shall have student participation on the 37 body judging student conduct. 38 c. All institution policy-making bodies shall have student represen- 39 tation on such body in policy-making roles for any policy affecting 40 students. 41 d. All students shall have access to designated student free speech 42 spaces on campus. 43 e. (i) A student journalist shall have the right to exercise free 44 speech and of the press in institution-sponsored media, regardless of 45 whether the media is supported financially by the institution or by use 46 of the facilities of an institution or produced in conjunction with a 47 class in which the student is enrolled. 48 (ii) A student journalist shall be responsible for determining the 49 news, opinion, and feature content of school-sponsored media. 50 (iii) There shall be no prior restraint of material prepared for offi- 51 cial publications of an institution except for the material described in 52 subparagraph (vi) of this paragraph. 53 (iv) No student media advisor or employee shall be dismissed, 54 suspended, disciplined, reassigned, transferred, or otherwise retaliated 55 against solely for acting to protect a pupil engaged in the conduct 56 authorized under this paragraph; and further no student media advisor or S. 5632--D 3 1 employee shall be dismissed, suspended, disciplined, reassigned, trans- 2 ferred or otherwise retaliated against solely for an action, undertaken 3 in good faith with this paragraph, which results in the prohibition of 4 the publication of speech pursuant to this paragraph. 5 (v) Nothing in this paragraph shall preclude a student media advisor 6 from teaching professional standards of English and journalism to 7 student journalists or from grading the performance of a student in 8 accordance with such standards. 9 (vi) To the extent that an institution administrator chooses to engage 10 in pre-publication review, the following forms of expression shall not 11 be protected by this article: 12 (1) Expression that is libelous, slanderous or obscene; 13 (2) Expression that constitutes an unwarranted invasion of privacy; 14 (3) Expression that violates federal, state or local law; or 15 (4) Expression that incites students to commit an unlawful act where 16 such unlawful act would be both imminent and likely to occur, to violate 17 the policies of the institution, or to materially and substantially 18 disrupt the orderly operation of such institution. 19 (vii) No expression made by students in the exercise of free speech or 20 freedom of the press protected by this paragraph shall be deemed to be 21 an expression of policy, opinion or position of the institution, nor 22 shall any such expression be considered to be an endorsement in any way 23 by the institution and no institution, student media advisor, employee, 24 parent, legal guardian or administrator of an institution shall be held 25 liable in any civil or criminal action for any expression made or 26 published by students, except in cases of willful or wanton misconduct. 27 Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to create any private 28 action on behalf of a student other than to seek injunctive relief 29 allowing the publication of the speech in question. 30 (viii) Political expression by students in school-sponsored media 31 shall not be deemed the use of public funds for political purposes. 32 f. The elected student government shall decide how funds from student 33 activity fees are allocated. Where an institution does not have an 34 elected student government, such institution shall develop a process to 35 allow for the student body to determine how student activity fees are 36 allocated. An institution shall not block a student activity fee funding 37 allocation decision made pursuant to this paragraph as long as such 38 allocation conforms with the student activity fee policies of the insti- 39 tution. 40 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of July next succeeding 41 the date on which it shall have become a law.